Missouri, session 2026, HB3392.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 144.063, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 144.063, to read as follows:
144.063. 1. In addition to the exemptions granted under this chapter, there shall also
be specifically exempted from state and local sales and use taxes defined, levied, or calculated
under section 32.085, sections 144.010 to 144.525, sections 144.600 to 144.761, or section
238.235, all sales of fencing materials used for agricultural purposes, and the purchase of
motor fuel, as defined in section 142.800, therefor which is used for agricultural purposes.
2. No retailer or distributor shall be financially liable for a consumer's on-road
use of dyed diesel fuel unless the retailer or distributor is found criminally negligent. No
retailer shall be required to maintain a physical exemption certificate for sales of dyed
diesel fuel, provided the fuel is clearly labeled "DYED DIESEL FUEL, NONTAXABLE
USE ONLY, PENALTY FOR TAXABLE USE.".
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.